Louisiana, session 2026, HB735.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1518.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1518.3. Transfer of property from the Department of Transportation and
Development
A. In accordance with the provisions of R.S. 39:11 et seq., the following
described property shall be transferred from the Department of Transportation and
Development to the Louisiana State University Health Sciences Center at
Shreveport:
Four (4) certain tracts or parcels of land, together with all
improvements situated thereon, consisting of Lots 52 through 66 of Salisbury
Park Subdivision and Lots 50, 51 and 52 of Samford Place Subdivision,
situated in Section 12, Township 17 North, Range 14 West, Northwestern
Land District, Caddo Parish, being the same property identified as Parcel
Nos. 28-3, UR-28-3, 50-5 and UR-50-5 in that certain Sale from Rountree
Olds-Cadillac Company, Inc., a Louisiana Corporation, represented therein
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 735 ENROLLED
by Brenda B. Stinson, its Vice president, unto the State of Louisiana and the
Department of Transportation and Development of the State of Louisiana, for
use by the Office of Highways, represented therein by Falcon A. Morgan of
said Department of Transportation and Development, dated September 23,
1987, and filed of record in the conveyance records of Caddo Parish on
October 5, 1987, under Instrument No. 01161048.
B. The commissioner of administration and the secretary of the Department
of Transportation and Development are authorized to execute such documents as
necessary to properly effectuate the transfer required by this Section.
C. The transfer required by Subsection A of this Section shall be made
effective July 1, 2026.
D. Upon completion of the transfer, the Louisiana State University Health
Sciences Center Shreveport shall cause documentation of the transfer to be recorded
in the conveyance records for Caddo Parish.
Section 2. Sections 5 through 8 of Act 93 of the 2025 Regular Session of the
Legislature are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.